Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.090

Department of labor and industries—Consultative visit, report—Compliance inspection, citation.

(1) Following a consultative visit pursuant to RCW 49.17.250, the department of labor and industries shall issue a report to the employer that the employer shall make available to its employees. The report shall contain:

(a) A description of the condition that is not in compliance and the text of the specific section or subsection of the applicable state or federal law or rule;

(b) A statement of what is required to achieve compliance;

(c) The date by which the department requires compliance to be achieved;

(d) Notice of means to contact technical assistance services provided by the department; and

(e) Notice of when, where, and to whom a request to extend the time to achieve compliance for good cause may be filed with the department.

(2) Following a compliance inspection pursuant to RCW 49.17.120, the department of labor and industries shall issue a citation for violations of industrial safety and health standards. The citation shall not assess a penalty if the violations:

(a) Are determined not to be of a serious nature;

(b) Have not been previously cited;

(c) Are not willful; and

(d) Do not have a mandatory penalty under chapter 49.17 RCW.

[ 1996 c 206 s 4; 1995 c 403 s 610.]

NOTES:

Findings—1996 c 206: See note following RCW 43.05.030.